test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_njuodas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - njuođâs: # ok, MLO
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuotˊtâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuotˊtâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuotˊtâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: njuoˊđâsin
    njuođâs+N+Par: njuoˊđâsid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: njuotˊtâseh
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: njuotˊtâsij
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: njuotˊtâsijd
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: njuotˊtâsáid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: njuotˊtâsijn
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: njuotˊtâsijguin
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: njuotˊtâsijttáá
